Wyoming, session 2025, SF0048.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xlii) is amended to
read:
39-11-105. Exemptions.
(a) The following property is exempt from property
taxation:
(xlii) If a person owns two thousand four
hundred dollars ($2,400.00) or less The first seventy‑five
thousand dollars ($75,000.00) in fair market value of
business property owned by a person in one (1) each county,
the business property shall be exempt as de minimis
business property from taxation. As used in this paragraph,
"business property" means taxable personal property
excluding any property that is exempt under W.S.
39-11-105(a)(xi) as personal property held for personal or
family use.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0048
ENROLLED ACT NO. 19, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective January 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2